Missouri, session 2026, SB1160.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 546.680, 546.690, 546.700, 546.710,
546.720, 546.730, 546.740, 546.750, 546.800, 546.810, 546.820,
557.021, 565.004, 565.005, 565.006, 565.020, 565.030, 565.032,
565.035, and 565.040, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 557.021,
565.004, 565.006, 565.020, and 565.040, to read as follows:
557.021. 1. Any offense defined outside this code
[which] that is declared to be a misdemeanor without
specification of the penalty therefor is a class A
misdemeanor.
2. Any offense defined outside this code [which] that
is declared to be a felony without specification of the
penalty therefor is a class E felony.
3. For the purpose of applying the extended term
provisions of section 558.016 and the minimum prison term
provisions of section 558.019 and for determining the
penalty for attempts, offenses defined outside of this code
shall be classified as follows:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1160 2
(1) If the offense is a felony:
(a) It is a class A felony if the authorized penalty
includes [death,] life imprisonment; imprisonment for life
without eligibility for probation, parole, or release except
by act of the governor; or imprisonment for a term of twenty
years or more;
(b) It is a class B felony if the maximum term of
imprisonment authorized exceeds ten years but is less than
twenty years;
(c) It is a class C felony if the maximum term of
imprisonment authorized is ten years;
(d) It is a class D felony if the maximum term of
imprisonment exceeds four years but is less than ten years;
(e) It is a class E felony if the maximum term of
imprisonment is four years or less;
(2) If the offense is a misdemeanor:
(a) It is a class A misdemeanor if the authorized
imprisonment exceeds six months in jail;
(b) It is a class B misdemeanor if the authorized
imprisonment exceeds thirty days but is not more than six
months;
(c) It is a class C misdemeanor if the authorized
imprisonment is thirty days or less;
(d) It is a class D misdemeanor if it includes a
mental state as an element of the offense and there is no
authorized imprisonment;
(e) It is an infraction if there is no authorized
imprisonment.
565.004. 1. Each homicide offense [which] that is
lawfully joined in the same indictment or information
together with any homicide offense or offense other than a
homicide shall be charged together with such offense in

SB 1160 3
separate counts. A count charging any offense of homicide
may only be charged and tried together with one or more
counts of any other homicide or offense other than a
homicide as provided in subsection 2 of section 545.140.
Except as provided in subsections 2[,] and 3[, and 4] of
this section, no murder in the first degree offense may be
tried together with any offense other than murder in the
first degree. In the event of a joinder of homicide
offenses, all offenses charged which are supported by the
evidence in the case, together with all proper lesser
offenses under section 565.029, shall, when requested by one
of the parties or the court, be submitted to the jury or, in
a jury-waived trial, considered by the judge.
2. A count charging any offense of homicide of a
particular individual may be joined in an indictment or
information and tried with one or more counts charging
alternatively any other homicide or offense other than a
homicide committed against that individual. The state shall
not be required to make an election as to the alternative
count on which it will proceed. This subsection in no way
limits the right to try in the conjunctive, where they are
properly joined under subsection 1 of this section, either
separate offenses other than murder in the first degree or
separate offenses of murder in the first degree committed
against different individuals.
3. When a defendant has been charged and proven before
trial to be a prior offender pursuant to chapter 558 so that
the judge shall assess punishment and not a jury for an
offense other than murder in the first degree, that offense
may be tried and submitted to the trier together with any
murder in the first degree charge with which it is lawfully
joined. In such case the judge will assess punishment on

SB 1160 4
any offense joined with a murder in the first degree charge
according to law and, when the trier is a jury, it shall be
instructed upon punishment on the charge of murder in the
first degree [in accordance with section 565.030.
4. When the state waives the death penalty for a
murder first degree offense, that offense may be tried and
submitted to the trier together with any other charge with
which it is lawfully joined].
565.006. 1. At any time before the commencement of
the trial of a homicide offense, the defendant may, with the
assent of the court, waive a trial by jury and agree to
submit all issues in the case to the court, whose finding
shall have the force and effect of a verdict of a jury.
Such a waiver must include a waiver of a trial by jury of
all issues and offenses charged in the case, including the
punishment to be assessed and imposed if the defendant is
found guilty.
2. No defendant who pleads guilty to a homicide
offense or who is found guilty of a homicide offense after
trial to the court without a jury shall be permitted a trial
by jury on the issue of the punishment to be imposed, except
by agreement of the state.
3. [If a defendant is found guilty of murder in the
first degree after a jury trial in which the state has not
waived the death penalty, the defendant may not waive a jury
trial of the issue of the punishment to be imposed, except
by agreement with the state and the court.
4.] Any waiver of a jury trial and agreement permitted
by this section shall be entered in the court record.
565.020. 1. A person commits the offense of murder in
the first degree if he or she knowingly causes the death of
another person after deliberation upon the matter.

SB 1160 5
2. The offense of murder in the first degree is a
class A felony, and, if a person is eighteen years of age or
older at the time of the offense, the punishment shall be
[either death or] imprisonment for life without eligibility
for probation [or], parole, or release except by act of the
governor. If a person has not reached his or her eighteenth
birthday at the time of the commission of the offense, the
punishment shall be as provided under section 565.033.
565.040. 1. [In the event that the death penalty
provided in this chapter is held to be unconstitutional,]
Any person convicted of murder in the first degree shall be
sentenced by the court to life imprisonment without
eligibility for probation, parole, or release except by act
of the governor[, with the exception that when a specific
aggravating circumstance found in a case is held to be
unconstitutional or invalid for another reason, the supreme
court of Missouri is further authorized to remand the case
for resentencing or retrial of the punishment pursuant to
subsection 5 of section 565.035].
2. In [the event that] any case in which a death
sentence has previously been imposed pursuant to this
chapter [is held to be unconstitutional,] but has not been
executed, the trial court [which] that previously sentenced
the defendant to death shall cause the defendant to be
brought before the court and shall sentence the defendant to
life imprisonment without eligibility for probation, parole,
or release except by act of the governor[, with the
exception that when a specific aggravating circumstance
found in a case is held to be inapplicable, unconstitutional
or invalid for another reason, the supreme court of Missouri
is further authorized to remand the case for retrial of the
punishment pursuant to subsection 5 of section 565.035].

SB 1160 6
[546.680. When judgment of death is
rendered by any court of competent jurisdiction,
a warrant signed by the judge and attested by
the clerk under the seal of the court must be
drawn and delivered to the sheriff. It must
state the conviction and judgment and appoint a
day on which the judgment must be executed,
which must not be less than thirty nor more than
sixty days from the date of judgment, and must
direct the sheriff to deliver the defendant, at
a time specified in said order, not more than
ten days from the date of judgment, to the chief
administrative officer of a correctional
facility of the department of corrections, for
execution.]
[546.690. The judge of a court at which a
conviction is had must, immediately after the
conviction, transmit to the governor of the
state, by mail or otherwise, a statement of the
conviction and judgment.]
[546.700. Whenever, for any reason, any
convict sentenced to the punishment of death
shall not have been executed pursuant to such
sentence, and the cause shall stand in full
force, the supreme court, or the court of the
county in which the conviction was had, on the
application of the prosecuting attorney, shall
issue a writ of habeas corpus to bring such
convict before the court; or if he be at large,
a warrant for his apprehension may be issued by
such court, or any judge thereof.]
[546.710. Upon such convicted offender
being brought before the court, they shall
proceed to inquire into the facts, and if no
legal reasons exist against the execution of
sentence, such court shall issue a warrant to
the director of the department of corrections,
for the execution of the prisoner at the time
therein specified, which execution shall be
obeyed by the director accordingly.]
[546.720. 1. The manner of inflicting the
punishment of death shall be by the

SB 1160 7
administration of lethal gas or by means of the
administration of lethal injection. And for
such purpose the director of the department of
corrections is hereby authorized and directed to
provide a suitable and efficient room or place,
enclosed from public view, within the walls of a
correctional facility of the department of
corrections, and the necessary appliances for
carrying into execution the death penalty by
means of the administration of lethal gas or by
means of the administration of lethal injection.
2. The director of the department of
corrections shall select an execution team which
shall consist of those persons who administer
lethal gas or lethal chemicals and those
persons, such as medical personnel, who provide
direct support for the administration of lethal
gas or lethal chemicals. The identities of
members of the execution team, as defined in the
execution protocol of the department of
corrections, shall be kept confidential.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, any portion of a record that could
identify a person as being a current or former
member of an execution team shall be privileged
and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena,
or other means of legal compulsion for
disclosure to any person or entity, the
remainder of such record shall not be privileged
or closed unless protected from disclosure by
law. The section of an execution protocol that
directly relates to the administration of lethal
gas or lethal chemicals is an open record, the
remainder of any execution protocol of the
department of corrections is a closed record.
3. A person may not, without the approval
of the director of the department of
corrections, knowingly disclose the identity of
a current or former member of an execution team
or disclose a record knowing that it could
identify a person as being a current or former
member of an execution team. Any person whose
identity is disclosed in violation of this
section shall:

SB 1160 8
(1) Have a civil cause of action against a
person who violates this section;
(2) Be entitled to recover from any such
person:
(a) Actual damages; and
(b) Punitive damages on a showing of a
willful violation of this section.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, if a member of the execution team
is licensed by a board or department, the
licensing board or department shall not censure,
reprimand, suspend, revoke, or take any other
disciplinary action against the person's license
because of his or her participation in a lawful
execution. All members of the execution team
are entitled to coverage under the state legal
expense fund established by section 105.711 for
conduct of such execution team member arising
out of and performed in connection with his or
her official duties on behalf of the state or
any agency of the state, provided that moneys in
this fund shall not be available for payment of
claims under chapter 287.]
[546.730. A judgment of death must be
executed within a correctional center of the
department of corrections; and such execution
shall be under the supervision and direction of
the director of the department of corrections.]
[546.740. The chief administrative officer
of the correctional center, or his duly
appointed representative shall be present at the
execution and the director of the department of
corrections shall invite the presence of the
attorney general of the state, and at least
eight reputable citizens, to be selected by him;
and he shall at the request of the defendant,
permit such clergy or religious leaders, not
exceeding two, as the defendant may name, and
any person, other than another incarcerated
offender, relatives or friends, not to exceed
five, to be present at the execution, together
with such peace officers as he may think
expedient, to witness the execution; but no

SB 1160 9
person under twenty-one years of age shall be
allowed to witness the execution.]
[546.750. After the execution the chief
administrative officer of the correctional
facility shall make a return upon the death
warrant to the court by which the judgment was
rendered, showing the time, mode and manner in
which it was executed.]
[546.800. If, after any female convict
shall be sentenced to the punishment of death,
the officer having charge of her person shall
have reason to suspect that she is pregnant, he
shall in like manner summon a jury of six
persons, not less than three of whom shall be
physicians, and shall give notice thereof to the
prosecuting attorney of the county where such
criminal proceedings originated, or to the
circuit attorney of the city of St. Louis, if
such criminal proceedings originated in that
city, who shall attend, and the proceedings
shall be had as provided.]
[546.810. The inquisition shall be signed
by the jury and the officer in charge of such
convict, and if it appear that such female
convict is pregnant with child, her execution
shall be suspended and the inquisition shall be
transmitted to the governor.]
[546.820. Whenever the governor shall be
satisfied that the cause of such suspension no
longer exists, he shall issue his warrant,
appointing a day for the execution of such
convict, pursuant to her sentence; or he may, at
his discretion, commute her punishment to
imprisonment in the penitentiary for life.]
[565.005. 1. At a reasonable time before
the commencement of the first stage of any trial
of murder in the first degree at which the death
penalty is not waived, the state and defendant,
upon request and without order of the court,
shall serve counsel of the opposing party with:
(1) A list of all aggravating or
mitigating circumstances as provided in

SB 1160 10
subsection 1 of section 565.032, which the party
intends to prove at the second stage of the
trial;
(2) The names of all persons whom the
party intends to call as witnesses at the second
stage of the trial;
(3) Copies or locations and custodian of
any books, papers, documents, photographs or
objects which the party intends to offer at the
second stage of the trial. If copies of such
materials are not supplied to opposing counsel,
the party shall cause them to be made available
for inspection and copying without order of the
court.
2. The disclosures required in subsection
1 of this section are supplemental to those
required by rules of the supreme court relating
to a continuing duty to disclose information,
the use of matters disclosed, matters not
subject to disclosure, protective orders, and
sanctions for failure to comply with an
applicable discovery rule or order, all of which
shall also apply to any disclosure required by
this section.]
[565.030. 1. Where murder in the first
degree is charged but not submitted or where the
state waives the death penalty, the submission
to the trier and all subsequent proceedings in
the case shall proceed as in all other criminal
cases.
2. Where murder in the first degree is
submitted to the trier without a waiver of the
death penalty, the trial shall proceed in two
stages before the same trier. At the first
stage the trier shall decide only whether the
defendant is guilty or not guilty of any
submitted offense. The issue of punishment
shall not be submitted to the trier at the first
stage. If an offense is charged other than
murder in the first degree in a count together
with a count of murder in the first degree, the
trial judge shall assess punishment on any such
offense according to law, after the defendant is

SB 1160 11
found guilty of such offense and after he finds
the defendant to be a prior offender pursuant to
chapter 558.
3. If murder in the first degree is
submitted and the death penalty was not waived
but the trier finds the defendant guilty of a
lesser homicide, a second stage of the trial
shall proceed as in all other criminal cases.
The attorneys may then argue as in other
criminal cases the issue of punishment, after
which the trier shall assess and declare the
punishment as in all other criminal cases.
4. If the trier at the first stage of a
trial where the death penalty was not waived
finds the defendant guilty of murder in the
first degree, a second stage of the trial shall
proceed at which the only issue shall be the
punishment to be assessed and declared.
Evidence in aggravation and mitigation of
punishment, including but not limited to
evidence supporting any of the aggravating or
mitigating circumstances listed in subsection 2
or 3 of section 565.032, may be presented
subject to the rules of evidence at criminal
trials. Such evidence may include, within the
discretion of the court, evidence concerning the
murder victim and the impact of the offense upon
the family of the victim and others. Rebuttal
and surrebuttal evidence may be presented. The
state shall be the first to proceed. If the
trier is a jury it shall be instructed on the
law. The attorneys may then argue the issue of
punishment to the jury, and the state shall have
the right to open and close the argument. The
trier shall assess and declare the punishment at
life imprisonment without eligibility for
probation, parole, or release except by act of
the governor:
(1) If the trier finds by a preponderance
of the evidence that the defendant is
intellectually disabled; or
(2) If the trier does not find beyond a
reasonable doubt at least one of the statutory

SB 1160 12
aggravating circumstances set out in subsection
2 of section 565.032; or
(3) If the trier concludes that there is
evidence in mitigation of punishment, including
but not limited to evidence supporting the
statutory mitigating circumstances listed in
subsection 3 of section 565.032, which is
sufficient to outweigh the evidence in
aggravation of punishment found by the trier; or
(4) If the trier decides under all of the
circumstances not to assess and declare the
punishment at death. If the trier is a jury it
shall be so instructed.
If the trier assesses and declares the
punishment at death it shall, in its findings or
verdict, set out in writing the aggravating
circumstance or circumstances listed in
subsection 2 of section 565.032 which it found
beyond a reasonable doubt. If the trier is a
jury it shall be instructed before the case is
submitted that if it is unable to decide or
agree upon the punishment the court shall assess
and declare the punishment at life imprisonment
without eligibility for probation, parole, or
release except by act of the governor or death.
The court shall follow the same procedure as set
out in this section whenever it is required to
determine punishment for murder in the first
degree.
5. Upon written agreement of the parties
and with leave of the court, the issue of the
defendant's intellectual disability may be taken
up by the court and decided prior to trial
without prejudicing the defendant's right to
have the issue submitted to the trier of fact as
provided in subsection 4 of this section.
6. As used in this section, the terms
100 "intellectual disability" or "intellectually
101 disabled" refer to a condition involving
102 substantial limitations in general functioning
103 characterized by significantly subaverage
104 intellectual functioning with continual
105 extensive related deficits and limitations in
106 two or more adaptive behaviors such as

SB 1160 13
107 communication, self-care, home living, social
108 skills, community use, self-direction, health
109 and safety, functional academics, leisure and
110 work, which conditions are manifested and
111 documented before eighteen years of age.
112 7. The provisions of this section shall
113 only govern offenses committed on or after
114 August 28, 2001.]
[565.032. 1. In all cases of murder in
the first degree for which the death penalty is
authorized, the judge in a jury-waived trial
shall consider, or shall include in his or her
instructions to the jury for it to consider:
(1) Whether a statutory aggravating
circumstance or circumstances enumerated in
subsection 2 of this section is established by
the evidence beyond a reasonable doubt; and
(2) If a statutory aggravating
circumstance or circumstances is proven beyond a
reasonable doubt, whether the evidence as a
whole justifies a sentence of death or a
sentence of life imprisonment without
eligibility for probation, parole, or release
except by act of the governor.
In determining the issues enumerated in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, the
trier shall consider all evidence which it finds
to be in aggravation or mitigation of
punishment, including evidence received during
the first stage of the trial and evidence
supporting any of the statutory aggravating or
mitigating circumstances set out in subsections
2 and 3 of this section. If the trier is a
jury, it shall not be instructed upon any
specific evidence which may be in aggravation or
mitigation of punishment, but shall be
instructed that each juror shall consider any
evidence which he or she considers to be
aggravating or mitigating.
2. Statutory aggravating circumstances for
a murder in the first degree offense shall be
limited to the following:

SB 1160 14
(1) The offense was committed by a person
with a prior record of conviction for murder in
the first degree, or the offense was committed
by a person who has one or more serious
assaultive criminal convictions;
(2) The murder in the first degree offense
was committed while the offender was engaged in
the commission or attempted commission of
another unlawful homicide;
(3) The offender by his or her act of
murder in the first degree knowingly created a
great risk of death to more than one person by
means of a weapon or device which would normally
be hazardous to the lives of more than one
person;
(4) The offender committed the offense of
murder in the first degree for himself or
herself or another, for the purpose of receiving
money or any other thing of monetary value from
the victim of the murder or another;
(5) The murder in the first degree was
committed against a judicial officer, former
judicial officer, prosecuting attorney or former
prosecuting attorney, circuit attorney or former
circuit attorney, assistant prosecuting attorney
or former assistant prosecuting attorney,
assistant circuit attorney or former assistant
circuit attorney, peace officer or former peace
officer, elected official or former elected
official during or because of the exercise of
his official duty;
(6) The offender caused or directed
another to commit murder in the first degree or
committed murder in the first degree as an agent
or employee of another person;
(7) The murder in the first degree was
outrageously or wantonly vile, horrible or
inhuman in that it involved torture, or
depravity of mind;
(8) The murder in the first degree was
committed against any peace officer, or fireman
while engaged in the performance of his or her
official duty;

SB 1160 15
(9) The murder in the first degree was
committed by a person in, or who has escaped
from, the lawful custody of a peace officer or
place of lawful confinement;
(10) The murder in the first degree was
committed for the purpose of avoiding,
interfering with, or preventing a lawful arrest
or custody in a place of lawful confinement, of
himself or herself or another;
(11) The murder in the first degree was
committed while the defendant was engaged in the
perpetration or was aiding or encouraging
another person to perpetrate or attempt to
perpetrate a felony of any degree of rape,
sodomy, burglary, robbery, kidnapping, or any
felony offense in chapter 195 or 579;
(12) The murdered individual was a witness
or potential witness in any past or pending
investigation or past or pending prosecution,
and was killed as a result of his or her status
as a witness or potential witness;
(13) The murdered individual was an
100 employee of an institution or facility of the
101 department of corrections of this state or local
102 correction agency and was killed in the course
103 of performing his or her official duties, or the
104 murdered individual was an inmate of such
105 institution or facility;
106 (14) The murdered individual was killed as
107 a result of the hijacking of an airplane, train,
108 ship, bus or other public conveyance;
109 (15) The murder was committed for the
110 purpose of concealing or attempting to conceal
111 any felony offense defined in chapter 195 or 579;
112 (16) The murder was committed for the
113 purpose of causing or attempting to cause a
114 person to refrain from initiating or aiding in
115 the prosecution of a felony offense defined in
116 chapter 195 or 579;
117 (17) The murder was committed during the
118 commission of an offense which is part of a
119 pattern of criminal street gang activity as
120 defined in section 578.421.

SB 1160 16
121 3. Statutory mitigating circumstances
122 shall include the following:
123 (1) The defendant has no significant
124 history of prior criminal activity;
125 (2) The murder in the first degree was
126 committed while the defendant was under the
127 influence of extreme mental or emotional
128 disturbance;
129 (3) The victim was a participant in the
130 defendant's conduct or consented to the act;
131 (4) The defendant was an accomplice in the
132 murder in the first degree committed by another
133 person and his or her participation was
134 relatively minor;
135 (5) The defendant acted under extreme
136 duress or under the substantial domination of
137 another person;
138 (6) The capacity of the defendant to
139 appreciate the criminality of his or her conduct
140 or to conform his or her conduct to the
141 requirements of law was substantially impaired;
142 (7) The age of the defendant at the time
143 of the offense.]
[565.035. 1. Whenever the death penalty
is imposed in any case, and upon the judgment
becoming final in the trial court, the sentence
shall be reviewed on the record by the supreme
court of Missouri. The circuit clerk of the
court trying the case, within ten days after
receiving the transcript, shall transmit the
entire record and transcript to the supreme
court together with a notice prepared by the
circuit clerk and a report prepared by the trial
judge. The notice shall set forth the title and
docket number of the case, the name of the
defendant and the name and address of his
attorney, a narrative statement of the judgment,
the offense, and the punishment prescribed. The
report by the judge shall be in the form of a
standard questionnaire prepared and supplied by
the supreme court of Missouri.

SB 1160 17
2. The supreme court of Missouri shall
consider the punishment as well as any errors
enumerated by way of appeal.
3. With regard to the sentence, the
supreme court shall determine:
(1) Whether the sentence of death was
imposed under the influence of passion,
prejudice, or any other arbitrary factor; and
(2) Whether the evidence supports the
jury's or judge's finding of a statutory
aggravating circumstance as enumerated in
subsection 2 of section 565.032 and any other
circumstance found;
(3) Whether the sentence of death is
excessive or disproportionate to the penalty
imposed in similar cases, considering both the
offense, the strength of the evidence and the
defendant.
4. Both the defendant and the state shall
have the right to submit briefs within the time
provided by the supreme court, and to present
oral argument to the supreme court.
5. The supreme court shall include in its
decision a reference to those similar cases
which it took into consideration. In addition
to its authority regarding correction of errors,
the supreme court, with regard to review of
death sentences, shall be authorized to:
(1) Affirm the sentence of death; or
(2) Set the sentence aside and resentence
the defendant to life imprisonment without
eligibility for probation, parole, or release
except by act of the governor; or
(3) Set the sentence aside and remand the
case for retrial of the punishment hearing. A
new jury shall be selected or a jury may be
waived by agreement of both parties and then the
punishment trial shall proceed in accordance
with this chapter, with the exception that the
evidence of the guilty verdict shall be
admissible in the new trial together with the
official transcript of any testimony and
evidence properly admitted in each stage of the

SB 1160 18
original trial where relevant to determine
punishment.
6. There shall be an assistant to the
supreme court, who shall be an attorney
appointed by the supreme court and who shall
serve at the pleasure of the court. The court
shall accumulate the records of all cases in
which the sentence of death or life imprisonment
without probation or parole was imposed after
May 26, 1977, or such earlier date as the court
may deem appropriate. The assistant shall
provide the court with whatever extracted
information the court desires with respect
thereto, including but not limited to a synopsis
or brief of the facts in the record concerning
the offense and the defendant. The court shall
be authorized to employ an appropriate staff,
within the limits of appropriations made for
that purpose, and such methods to compile such
data as are deemed by the supreme court to be
appropriate and relevant to the statutory
questions concerning the validity of the
sentence. The office of the assistant to the
supreme court shall be attached to the office of
the clerk of the supreme court for
administrative purposes.
7. In addition to the mandatory sentence
review, there shall be a right of direct appeal
of the conviction to the supreme court of
Missouri. This right of appeal may be waived by
the defendant. If an appeal is taken, the
appeal and the sentence review shall be
consolidated for consideration. The court shall
render its decision on legal errors enumerated,
the factual substantiation of the verdict, and
the validity of the sentence.]
✓